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DI−754
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINEIMMOBILISERSYSTEM(2UZ −FE)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC B2785/99 IG Switch ON Malfunction

DTC B2786/99 IG Switch OFF Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B2785/99
SShort circuit in IGswitchcircuit
S IGswitchadheres toONposition S IGswitch

EFI M i R l

B2786/99
SOpencircuit in IGswitchcircuit
S IGswitchadheres toOFFposition

SEFIMainRelay
SWireharness

WIRING DIAGRAM
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−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE IMMOBILISER SYSTEM (2UZ−FE)
DI−755

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check voltage between terminals + B and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
tors.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment.
(b) Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals + B and E1 of Engine and
ECT ECU connectors.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

OK Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in
problem symptoms table (See page DI−753).

NG

2 Check for open in harness and connector between terminal E1 of Engine and
ECT ECU and body ground (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check EFI main relay (Marking: EFI).

NG Replace EFI main relay.

OK
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IGN Fuse

Driver Side J/B

DI−756
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE IMMOBILISER SYSTEM (2UZ−FE)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

4 Check EFI fuse.

NG Check for short in all the harness and compo-
nents connected to EFI fuse.

OK

5 Check for open in harness and connector between EFI main relay (Marking : EFI)
and battery, EFI main relay (Marking : EFI) and Engine and ECT ECU (See page
IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

6 Check IGN fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove the IGN fuse from the driver side J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity of IGN fuse.
OK:

Continuity

NG Check for short in all the harness and compo-
nents connected to IGN fuse.

OK



−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE IMMOBILISER SYSTEM (2UZ−FE)
DI−757

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

7 Check ignition switch (See page BE−20).

NG Replace ignition switch.

OK

8 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between IG switch and EFI
main relay, EFI main relay and body ground (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace wire harness and connector.

OK

Replace Engine and ECT ECU.


